Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-112
State grass; little blue stem.

Little blue stem, known as andropogon scoparius, is hereby declared the official state grass of Nebraska.

Laws 1969, c. 829, § 1, p. 3151;

R.R.S.1943, § 84-729.